South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3379.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-36-2120 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (85) sales made to a nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal income tax pursuant to Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect July 1, 2025. ----XX----